Hawaii statutes.
§142-46 Using unregistered brand
prohibited; penalty. It shall be unlawful for any person to use any brand
that has not been duly registered according to law. Any person using any brand
that has not been duly registered according to law shall be fined not less than
$1 nor more than $200 for each animal so branded. [L 1893-4, c 39, §1; am L
1903, c 8, §2; RL 1925, §686; RL 1935, §264; RL 1945, §1073; RL 1955, §20-45;
HRS §142-46; am L 1984, c 8, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next